Utah statutes.
58-60-306.   Qualifications for admission to examination.

All applicants for admission to any examination qualifying an individual for licensure under this part shall:

(1)  submit an application on a form provided by the division;

(2)  pay the fee established for the examination; and

(3)  certify under penalty of perjury as evidenced by notarized signature on the application for admission to the examination that the applicant has completed the education requirement and been awarded the earned degree required for licensure.



Enacted by Chapter 32, 1994 General Session

